Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 99 Full-Day Kindergarten Accessibility Act

16-99-1.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Full-Day Kindergarten Accessibility Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 372, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 382, § 1.

16-99-2.
Legislative findings.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares as follows:

According to the National Center for Education Statistics, children in full-day kindergarten classes make greater academic gains in both reading and mathematics compared to those in half-day classes;

According to Kids Count RI, full-day kindergarten can contribute to closing academic achievement gaps between lower and higher income children;

According to the National Center for Education Statistics, full-day kindergarten classes are more likely than half-day classes to instruct students daily in the areas of mathematics, social studies and science; and

According to Kids Count RI, children in full-day kindergarten are more likely to be ready for first grade than those in half-day programs, regardless of family income, parental education and school characteristics.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 372, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 382, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 6, § 1.

16-99-3.
Full-day kindergarten.

For the purpose of this chapter, the term “full-day kindergarten” means a kindergarten program that operates a minimum of five and one-half (51/2) hours or three hundred thirty (330) minutes of actual school work, excluding lunch, recess periods, common planning time, pre- and post-school teacher time, study halls, homeroom periods, student passing time and any other time that is not actual instructional time.

The commissioner of elementary and secondary education has discretion to further define and approve full-day kindergarten programs consistent with this section through the 2015-2016 school year.

Beginning August 2016, each school district must offer full-day kindergarten to every eligible student to qualify for state education aid provided for in title 16. In fiscal year 2016, the Rhode Island department of elementary and secondary education shall provide funding to support transition expenses for all districts that do not offer universal full-day kindergarten programs in the 2015-2016 school year. This funding shall not exceed the amount of state aid that would otherwise have been provided to the district for operating a universal full-day kindergarten program and shall be based upon 2015 enrollment data and funding formula transition rates. For purposes of the calculation under this section, a district’s half-day kindergarten enrollment as of March 2015 shall be multiplied by two.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 372, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 382, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 6, § 1.

16-99-4.
Eligible school districts; funding.

A school district shall be eligible to request funding pursuant to §

16-99-4(b)

, if:

The school district is a public school district; and

The school district operates a half-day kindergarten program as of September 1, 2012, but not a full-day kindergarten, as defined herein, serving more than one-half of the kindergarten students in the district as determined on a headcount basis.

Subject to appropriation, beginning with school year 2013-2014 and through school year 2014-2015, the commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall rank and approve eligible public school districts that voluntarily implement a full-day kindergarten program as defined herein. The aforementioned school district shall receive funding to offset a portion of the reasonable, one-time start-up costs including, but not limited to, desks, books, facility upgrades, ancillary costs associated with relocation of students, costs associated with the development and implementation of new curriculum, and any other necessary expenses associated with each school’s implementation of a full-day kindergarten program. Ranking shall be based upon criteria established by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education to ensure the quality and sustainability of the full-day kindergarten programs implemented.

In ranking the school districts’ proposals, the commissioner shall consider the quality and sustainability of the program and the average number of children eligible for USDA reimbursable school meals served by the respective district’s elementary schools with priority given to school districts with enrollment greater than eight thousand (8,000).

If no school district has enrollment greater than eight thousand (8,000),
then priority shall be given to school districts with enrollment greater than four thousand (4,000).

The commissioner shall fully fund all eligible expenditures of each district in rank order. If a district’s proposal cannot be fully funded, the district may either accept the available funding for the project or refuse funding. If funding is refused, the commissioner shall fund the next eligible school district’s request based on the aforementioned ranking.

School districts receiving funds pursuant to this chapter must operate only a full-day program, no half-day programs. The full-day kindergarten program must continue to operate for five (5) years.

All funding provided under this section is subject to appropriation.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (d), school districts that request funding pursuant to this chapter may be allowed to phase-in the implementation of a full-day kindergarten program, provided that the district provides the department of elementary and secondary education with a schedule and plan as to the implementation of such program.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 372, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 382, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 358, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 431, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 456, § 3; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 6, § 1.

16-99-5.
Reporting.

The Rhode Island department of elementary and secondary education shall report to the senate president, speaker of the house, and the governor on the progress of this initiative on or before May 1st, 2014, and on an annual basis by May 1st of each year thereafter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 372, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 382, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 358, § 1.